el: Περιεκτικότητα σε φυτική ύλη (VM): Υψηλή; Χαμηλή; Μεσαία; Καθόλου; Άλλο
da: Indhold af vegetabilsk materiale (VM): Højt; Lavt; Medium; Intet; Andet
sk-SK: Obsah rastlinnej hmoty (VM): Vysoký; Nízky; Stredný; Žiadny; Iné
hu: Növényianyag-tartalom (VM): Magas; Alacsony; Közepes; Nincs; Egyéb
ru: Содержание растительных примесей (VM): Высокое; Низкое; Среднее; Нет; Другое
pt-PT: Teor de matéria vegetal (VM): Alto; Baixo; Médio; Nenhum; Outro
ro-RO: Conținut de materie vegetală (VM): Ridicat; Scăzut; Mediu; Niciunul; Altele
ko: 식물성 물질(VM) 함량: 높음; 낮음; 보통; 없음; 기타
zh-TW: 植物雜質 (VM) 含量: 高; 低; 中; 無; 其他
bg-BG: Съдържание на растителна маса (VM): Високо; Ниско; Средно; Няма; Друго
nb: Innhold i vegetabilsk materiale (VM): Høy; Lav; Middels; Ingen; Annet
zh-CN: 植物物质 (VM) 含量: 高; 低; 中等; 无; 其他
pl: Zawartość zanieczyszczeń roślinnych (VM): Wysoka; Niska; Średnia; Brak; Inne
it: Contenuto di materia vegetale (MV): Alto; Basso; Medio; Nessuno; Altro
nl: Plantaardig materiaal (VM) gehalte: Hoog; Laag; Gemiddeld; Geen; Overig
tr: Bitkisel madde (VM) içeriği: Yüksek; Düşük; Orta; Yok; Diğer
en: Vegetable matter (VM) content: High; Low; Medium; None; Other
fr: Teneur en matières végétales (VM): Élevée; Faible; Moyenne; Aucune; Autre
es: Contenido de materia vegetal (MV): Alto; Bajo; Medio; Ninguno; Otro
sl-SI: Vsebnost rastlinskih primesi (VM): Visoka; Nizka; Srednja; Brez; Drugo
ja: 植物性異物 (VM) 含有量: 高; 低; 中; なし; その他
pt-BR: Matéria vegetal (VM) teor: Alto; Baixo; Médio; Nenhum; Outro
vi: Nội dung thực vật (VM): Cao; Thấp; Trung bình; Không có; Khác
cs: Obsah rostlinné hmoty (VM): Vysoký; Nízký; Střední; Žádný; Jiné
de: Anteil pflanzlicher Bestandteile (VM): Hoch; Niedrig; Mittel; Keine; Sonstiges
lt-LT: Augalinių priemaišų (VM) kiekis: Didelis; Mažas; Vidutinis; Nėra; Kita
sv: Innehåll av vegetabiliskt material (VM): Hög; Låg; Medium; Ingen; Övrigt
hr-HR: Sadržaj biljne tvari (VM): Visok; Nizak; Srednji; Nema; Ostalo
th: เนื้อหาเรื่องผัก (VM): สูง; ต่ำ; ปานกลาง; ไม่มี; อื่นๆ
fi: Kasviainespitoisuus (VM): Korkea; Matala; Keskitaso; Ei mitään; Muu